Idaho, session 2025, S1200.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Idaho State Historical Society the fol-
lowing amounts to be expended according to the designated expense classes
from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026:
FOR FOR FOR
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY TOTAL
FROM:
General
Fund $56,900 $450,000 $506,900
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 76,300 48,600 $49,400 174,300
Federal Grant
Fund 62,900 0 0 62,900
TOTAL $196,100 $498,600 $49,400 $744,100
SECTION 2. FTP AUTHORIZATION. In addition to any other authorization
provided by law, the full-time equivalent position authorization provided
to the Idaho State Historical Society is hereby increased by three (3.00) for
the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.